zh-TW: 蠟混合成分: 100% 單一蠟 (無混合); 椰子蠟 + 蜂蠟; 椰子蠟 + 石蠟; 其他混合蠟; 棕櫚蠟 + 石蠟; 棕櫚蠟 + 大豆蠟; 石蠟 + 蜂蠟; 菜籽蠟 + 椰子蠟; 菜籽蠟 + 大豆蠟; 大豆蠟 + 蜂蠟; 大豆蠟 + 椰子蠟; 大豆蠟 + 石蠟; 其他
es: Composición de la mezcla de cera: 100 % cera única (sin mezcla); Coco + cera de abejas; Coco + parafina; Otra mezcla; Palma + parafina; Palma + soja; Parafina + cera de abejas; Colza/canola + coco; Colza/canola + soja; Soja + cera de abejas; Soja + coco; Soja + parafina; Otro
ro-RO: Compoziția amestecului de ceară: 100% ceară unică (fără amestec); Cocos + Ceară de albine; Cocos + Parafină; Alt amestec; Palmier + Parafină; Palmier + Soia; Parafină + Ceară de albine; Rapiță/Canola + Cocos; Rapiță/Canola + Soia; Soia + Ceară de albine; Soia + Cocos; Soia + Parafină; Altele
tr: Balmumu karışım bileşimi: %100 tekli mum (karışım içermez); Hindistan cevizi + balmumu; Hindistan cevizi + parafin; Diğer karışım; Palmiye + parafin; Palmiye + soya; Parafin + balmumu; Kolza/kanola + Hindistan cevizi; Kolza/kanola + soya; Soya + balmumu; Soya + Hindistan cevizi; Soya + parafin; Diğer
th: ส่วนประกอบของแว็กซ์ผสม: แว็กซ์ชนิดเดียว 100% (ไม่ผสม); มะพร้าว + ขี้ผึ้ง; มะพร้าว + พาราฟิน; ส่วนผสมอื่นๆ; ปาล์ม + พาราฟิน; ปาล์ม + ถั่วเหลือง; พาราฟิน + ขี้ผึ้ง; เรพซีด/คาโนลา + มะพร้าว; เรพซีด/คาโนลา + ถั่วเหลือง; ถั่วเหลือง + ขี้ผึ้ง; ถั่วเหลือง + มะพร้าว; ถั่วเหลือง + พาราฟิน; อื่นๆ
nb: Sammensetning av voksblanding: 100 % ren voks (ingen blanding); Kokos + bivoks; Kokos + parafin; Annen blanding; Palme + parafin; Palme + soya; Parafin + bivoks; Raps + kokos; Raps + soya; Soya + bivoks; Soya + kokos; Soya + parafin; Annet
sv: Vaxblandningens sammansättning: 100 % enskilt vax (ingen blandning); Kokos och bivax; Kokos och paraffin; Annan blandning; Palm och paraffin; Palm och soja; Paraffin och bivax; Raps och kokos; Raps och soja; Soja och bivax; Soja och kokos; Soja och paraffin; Övrigt
it: Composizione della miscela di cera: 100% cera singola (nessuna miscela); Cocco + cera d'api; Cocco + paraffina; Altra miscela; Palma + paraffina; Palma + soia; Paraffina + cera d'api; Colza/canola + cocco; Colza/canola + soia; Soia + cera d'api; Soia + cocco; Soia + paraffina; Altro
ko: 왁스 혼합 구성: 100% 단일 왁스(블렌드 없음); 코코넛 + 밀랍; 코코넛 + 파라핀; 기타 블렌드; 팜 + 파라핀; 팜 + 대두; 파라핀 + 밀랍; 유채씨/카놀라 + 코코넛; 유채씨/카놀라 + 대두; 대두 + 밀랍; 대두 + 코코넛; 대두 + 파라핀; 기타
lt-LT: Vaško mišinio sudėtis: 100 % grynas vaškas (be priemaišų); Kokosų ir bičių vaškas; Kokosų vaškas ir parafinas; Kitas mišinys; Palmių vaškas ir parafinas; Palmių ir sojų vaškas; Parafinas ir bičių vaškas; Rapsų ir kokosų vaškas; Rapsų ir sojų vaškas; Sojų ir bičių vaškas; Sojų ir kokosų vaškas; Sojų vaškas ir parafinas; Kita
bg-BG: Състав на восъчна смес: 100% единичен восък (без бленд); Кокосов + пчелен восък; Кокосов восък + парафин; Друг бленд; Палмов восък + парафин; Палмов + соев восък; Парафин + пчелен восък; Рапичен + кокосов восък; Рапичен + соев восък; Соев + пчелен восък; Соев + кокосов восък; Соев восък + парафин; Други
en: Wax blend composition: 100% single wax (no blend); Coconut + Beeswax; Coconut + Paraffin; Other blend; Palm + Paraffin; Palm + Soy; Paraffin + Beeswax; Rapeseed/Canola + Coconut; Rapeseed/Canola + Soy; Soy + Beeswax; Soy + Coconut; Soy + Paraffin; Other
fi: Vahaseoksen koostumus: 100 % yksittäistä vahaa (ei sekoitus); Kookos + mehiläisvaha; Kookos + parafiini; Muu sekoitus; Palmu + parafiini; Palmu + soija; Parafiini + mehiläisvaha; Rypsi/Rapsi + kookos; Rypsi/Rapsi + soija; Soija + mehiläisvaha; Soija + kookos; Soija + parafiini; Muu
sl-SI: Sestava mešanice voska: 100 % enojni vosek (brez mešanice); Kokos + čebelji vosek; Kokos + parafin; Druga mešanica; Palma + parafin; Palma + soja; Parafin + čebelji vosek; Oljna ogrščica + kokos; Oljna ogrščica + soja; Soja + čebelji vosek; Soja + kokos; Soja + parafin; Drugo
pt-PT: Composição da mistura de cera: 100% cera única (sem mistura); Coco e cera de abelha; Coco e parafina; Outra mistura; Palma e parafina; Palma e soja; Parafina e cera de abelha; Colza/canola e coco; Colza/canola e soja; Soja e cera de abelha; Soja e coco; Soja e parafina; Outro
fr: Composition du mélange de cires: 100 % cire pure (sans mélange); Noix de coco + Cire d’abeille; Noix de coco + Paraffine; Autre mélange; Palme + Paraffine; Palme + Soja; Paraffine + Cire d’abeille; Colza/Canola + Noix de coco; Colza/Canola + Soja; Soja + Cire d’abeille; Soja + Noix de coco; Soja + Paraffine; Autre
el: Σύνθεση μείγματος κεριού: 100% μονό κερί (χωρίς μείγμα); Καρύδα + Μελισσοκέρι; Καρύδα + Παραφίνη; Άλλο μείγμα; Φοίνικας + Παραφίνη; Φοίνικας + Σόγια; Παραφίνη + Μελισσοκέρι; Ελαιοκράμβη/Canola + Καρύδα; Ελαιοκράμβη/Canola + Σόγια; Σόγια + Μελισσοκέρι; Σόγια + Καρύδα; Σόγια + Παραφίνη; Άλλο
vi: Thành phần hỗn hợp sáp: 100% sáp đơn (không pha trộn); Dừa + Sáp ong; Dừa + Parafin; Hỗn hợp khác; Cọ + Parafin; Cọ + Đậu nành; Parafin + Sáp ong; Hạt cải/Canola + Dừa; Hạt cải/Canola + Đậu nành; Đậu nành + Sáp ong; Đậu nành + Dừa; Đậu nành + Parafin; Khác
da: Sammensætning af voksblanding: 100 % enkeltvoks (ingen blanding); Kokos + bivoks; Kokos + paraffin; Anden blanding; Palme + paraffin; Palme + soja; Paraffin + bivoks; Raps/canola + kokos; Raps/canola + soja; Soja + bivoks; Soja + kokos; Soja + paraffin; Andet
sk-SK: Zloženie voskovej zmesi: 100 % jednodruhový vosk (bez zmesi); Kokosový + včelí vosk; Kokosový vosk + parafín; Iná zmes; Palmový vosk + parafín; Palmový + sójový vosk; Parafín + včelí vosk; Repkový + kokosový vosk; Repkový + sójový vosk; Sójový + včelí vosk; Sójový + kokosový vosk; Sójový vosk + parafín; Iné
hr-HR: Sastav mješavine voska: 100 % jedan vosak (bez mješavina); Kokos + pčelinji vosak; Kokos + parafin; Druga mješavina; Palma + parafin; Palma + soja; Parafin + pčelinji vosak; Uljana repica / kanola + kokos; Uljana repica / kanola + soja; Soja + pčelinji vosak; Soja + kokos; Soja + parafin; Ostalo
pt-BR: Mistura de ceras composição: 100% cera única (sem mistura); Coco + cera de abelha; Coco + parafina; Outra mistura; Palma + parafina; Palma + soja; Parafina + cera de abelha; Colza/canola + coco; Colza/canola + soja; Soja + cera de abelha; Soja + coco; Soja + parafina; Outros
de: Zusammensetzung der Wachsmischung: 100 % reines Wachs (kein Blend); Kokos + Bienenwachs; Kokos + Paraffin; Sonstige Mischung; Palm + Paraffin; Palm + Soja; Paraffin + Bienenwachs; Raps/Canola + Kokos; Raps/Canola + Soja; Soja + Bienenwachs; Soja + Kokos; Soja + Paraffin; Sonstige
hu: Viaszkeverék összetétele: 100% egyféle viasz (nem kevert); Kókusz + méhviasz; Kókusz + paraffin; Egyéb keverék; Pálma + paraffin; Pálma + szója; Paraffin + méhviasz; Repce/kanola + kókusz; Repce/kanola + szója; Szója + méhviasz; Szója + kókusz; Szója + paraffin; Egyéb
nl: Was mengsel samenstelling: 100% enkele was (geen melange); Kokos + bijenwas; Kokos + paraffine; Andere melange; Palm + paraffine; Palm + soja; Paraffine + bijenwas; Koolzaad/canola + kokos; Koolzaad/canola + soja; Soja + bijenwas; Soja + kokos; Soja + paraffine; Overige
ja: ワックスブレンド組成: 100%単一ワックス (ブレンドなし); ココナッツ + 蜜蝋; ココナッツ + パラフィン; その他のブレンド; パーム + パラフィン; パーム + 大豆; パラフィン + 蜜蝋; 菜種/キャノーラ + ココナッツ; 菜種/キャノーラ + 大豆; 大豆 + 蜜蝋; 大豆 + ココナッツ; 大豆 + パラフィン; その他
cs: Složení voskové směsi: 100% jednodruhový vosk (bez směsi); Kokosový a včelí vosk; Kokosový vosk a parafín; Jiná směs; Palmový vosk a parafín; Palmový a sójový vosk; Parafín a včelí vosk; Řepkový a kokosový vosk; Řepkový a sójový vosk; Sójový a včelí vosk; Sójový a kokosový vosk; Sójový vosk a parafín; Jiné
pl: Skład mieszanki wosku: 100% jeden rodzaj wosku (bez mieszanek); Kokos + wosk pszczeli; Kokos + parafina; Inna mieszanka; Palma + parafina; Palma + soja; Parafina + wosk pszczeli; Rzepak + kokos; Rzepak + soja; Soja + wosk pszczeli; Soja + kokos; Soja + parafina; Inne
zh-CN: 蜡混合物成分: 100% 单一蜡（不混合）; 椰子蜡 + 蜂蜡; 椰子蜡 + 石蜡; 其他混合; 棕榈蜡 + 石蜡; 棕榈蜡 + 大豆蜡; 石蜡 + 蜂蜡; 油菜籽蜡/芥花籽蜡 + 椰子蜡; 油菜籽蜡/芥花籽蜡 + 大豆蜡; 大豆蜡 + 蜂蜡; 大豆蜡 + 椰子蜡; 大豆蜡 + 石蜡; 其他
ru: Состав восковой смеси: 100% моновоск (без примесей); Кокосовый + пчелиный воск; Кокосовый воск + парафин; Другая смесь; Пальмовый воск + парафин; Пальмовый + соевый воск; Парафин + пчелиный воск; Рапсовый + кокосовый воск; Рапсовый + соевый воск; Соевый + пчелиный воск; Соевый + кокосовый воск; Соевый воск + парафин; Другое